Pennsylvania, session 2025-2026, SB77.
hereby enacts as follows:Section 1. Section 1329 of the act of March 10, 1949 (P.L.30, No.14), known as the Public School Code of 1949, is amended by adding a subsection to read:Section 1329. Excuses from Attending School.--* * *(f) In addition to the excuses from attending school under this section, a school district may excuse a student from school attendance for a maximum of two (2) days each school year without an excuse.Section 2. This act shall take effect in 60 days.1234567891011121314151617